Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
CHAPTER 411 Rights of Action and Survival of Actions
411.186.
Assessment of punitive damages.

In any civil action where claims for punitive damages are included, the jury or judge if jury trial has been waived, shall determine concurrently with all other issues presented, whether punitive damages may be assessed.

If the trier of fact determines that punitive damages should be awarded, the trier of fact shall then assess the sum of punitive damages. In determining the amount of punitive damages to be assessed, the trier of fact should consider the following factors:

The likelihood at the relevant time that serious harm would arise from the defendant’s misconduct;

The degree of the defendant’s awareness of that likelihood;

The profitability of the misconduct to the defendant;

The duration of the misconduct and any concealment of it by the defendant; and

Any actions by the defendant to remedy the misconduct once it became known to the defendant.

KRS

411.184

and this section are applicable to all cases in which punitive damages are sought.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 224, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

411.187.
Supersedeas bond to stay execution of judgment granting any relief during appeal — Limit — Rescission of limit if assets diverted or dissipated.

In any civil action brought under any legal theory, the amount of a supersedeas bond necessary to stay execution of a judgment granting legal, equitable, or any other relief during the entire course of all appeals or discretionary reviews of the judgment by all appellate courts shall be set in accordance with applicable law, except that the total amount of the supersedeas bonds that are required collectively of all appellants during the appeal of a civil action may not exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in the aggregate, regardless of the amount of the judgment that is appealed.

If the appellee proves by a preponderance of the evidence that a party bringing an appeal, for whom the supersedeas bond requirement has been limited, is purposefully dissipating or diverting assets outside of the ordinary course of its business for the purpose of avoiding ultimate payment of the judgment, the limitation granted under subsection (1) of this section shall be rescinded and a court may require the appellant to post a bond in an amount up to the full amount of the judgment pursuant to the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 205, § 1, effective March 29, 2000; 2007, ch. 111, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

411.188.
Notification of parties holding subrogation rights — Collateral source payments and subrogation rights admissible.

This section shall apply to all actions for damages, whether in contract or tort, commenced after July 15, 1988.

At the commencement of an action seeking to recover damages, it shall be the duty of the plaintiff or his attorney to notify, by certified mail, those parties believed by him to hold subrogation rights to any award received by the plaintiff as a result of the action. The notification shall state that a failure to assert subrogation rights by intervention, pursuant to Kentucky Civil Rule 24, will result in a loss of those rights with respect to any final award received by the plaintiff as a result of the action.

Collateral source payments, except life insurance, the value of any premiums paid by or on behalf of the plaintiff for same, and known subrogation rights shall be an admissible fact in any civil trial.

A certified list of the parties notified pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall also be filed with the clerk of the court at the commencement of the action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 224, § 4, effective July 15, 1988.

411.190.
Obligations of owner to persons using land for recreation.

As used in this section:

“Land” means land, roads, water, watercourses, private ways and buildings, structures, and machinery or equipment when attached to the realty;

“Owner” means the possessor of a fee, reversionary, or easement interest, a tenant, lessee, occupant, or person in control of the premises;

“Recreational purpose” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following, or any combination thereof: hunting, fishing, swimming, boating, camping, picnicking, hiking, bicycling, horseback riding, pleasure driving, nature study, water-skiing, winter sports, and viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites; and

“Charge” means the admission price or fee asked in return for invitation or permission to enter or go upon the land but does not include fees for general use permits issued by a government agency for access to public lands if the permits are valid for a period of not less than thirty (30) days.

The purpose of this section is to encourage owners of land to make land and water areas available to the public for recreational purposes by limiting their liability toward persons entering thereon for such purposes.

Except as specifically recognized by or provided in subsection (6) of this section, an owner of land owes no duty of care to keep the premises safe for entry or use by others for recreational purposes, or to give any warning of a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on the premises to persons entering for such purposes.

Except as specifically recognized by or provided in subsection (6) of this section, an owner of land who either directly or indirectly invites or permits without charge any person to use the property for recreation purposes does not thereby:

Extend any assurance that the premises are safe for any purpose;

Confer upon the person the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed; or

Assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to person or property caused by an act or omission of those persons.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall be deemed applicable to the duties and liability of an owner of land leased to the state or any subdivision thereof for recreational purposes.

Nothing in this section limits in any way any liability which otherwise exists:

For willful or malicious failure to guard or warn against a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity; or

For injury suffered in any case where the owner of land charges the person or persons who enter or go on the land for the recreational use thereof, except that in the case of land leased to the state or a subdivision thereof, any consideration received by the owner for the lease shall not be deemed a charge within the meaning of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Create a duty of care or ground of liability for injury to persons or property;

Relieve any person using the land of another for recreational purposes from any obligation which he may have in the absence of this section to exercise care in his use of the land and in his activities thereon, or from the legal consequences of failure to employ such care; or

Ripen into a claim for adverse possession, absent a claim of title or legal right.

No action for the recovery of real property, including establishment of prescriptive easement, right-of-way, or adverse possession, may be brought by any person whose claim is based on use solely for recreational purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 252, §§ 1 to 7; 1998, ch. 275, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 338, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 306, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

411.195.
Enforceability of written agreement to pay attorney fees in event of default.

Any provisions in a writing which create a debt, or create a lien on real property, requiring the debtor, obligor, lienor or mortgagor to pay reasonable attorney fees incurred by the creditor, obligee or lienholder in the event of default, shall be enforceable, provided, however, such fees shall only be allowed to the extent actually paid or agreed to be paid, and shall not be allowed to a salaried employee of such creditor, obligor or lienholder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 169, §
1, effective July 15, 1980; repealed and reenact., Acts 1984, ch. 111, § 164, effective July 13, 1984.

411.200.
Immunity from civil liability of officer, director or trustee of nonprofit organization.

Any person who serves as a director, officer, volunteer or trustee of a nonprofit organization qualified as a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as from time to time amended, and who is not compensated for such services on a salary or prorated equivalent basis, shall be immune from civil liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or injury occurring on or after July 15, 1988, if such person was acting in good faith and within the scope of his official functions and duties, unless such damage or injury was caused by the willful or wanton misconduct of such person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 2, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section is unconstitutional and in violation of §§ 14, 54, and 241 of the Kentucky Constitution to the extent that it attempts to immunize from civil liability any act or omission resulting in damage or injury caused by a person who serves as a director, officer, volunteer or a trustee of a nonprofit organization.

OAG 91-89

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Lawyers Serving as Directors of Kentucky Nonprofit Corporations: Special Considerations, Vol. 69, No. 5, Sept. 2005, Ky. Bench & Bar 21.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Stipanowich, The Quiet Revolution Comes to Kentucky: A Case Study in Community Mediation, 81 Ky. L.J. 855 (1992-93).

411.210.
Action for theft of identity or trafficking in stolen identities — Statute of limitations.

In addition to pursuing any other remedy, anyone who is a victim under KRS

434.872

,

434.874

,

514.160

, or

514.170

, shall have a cause of action, either where the victim resides or the defendant resides, for compensatory and punitive damages against anyone who violates KRS

434.872

,

434.874

,

514.160

, or

514.170

and, if successful, shall be awarded reasonable costs and attorneys’ fees.

The statute of limitations for cases under the provisions of this section shall be five (5) years from the date of the discovery of the violation of KRS

434.872

,

434.874

,

514.160

, or

514.170

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 174, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 175, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

411.212.
Action for damages caused by falsely reporting an incident — Liability.

In addition to any restitution ordered by the court under KRS 519.040(4), any person who suffers harm as a result of a violation of KRS 519.040(1)(a) or (e) may recover damages in a civil cause of action against the alleged perpetrator, including but not limited to damages for infliction of emotional distress, compensatory and punitive damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

The action may be filed in a court of competent jurisdiction for the county in which the alleged violation occurred or the plaintiff resides.

An individual found liable under this section shall be jointly and severally liable with each other person, if any, found liable under this section for the damages arising from the same violation of KRS

519.040

.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 148, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

411.215.
Action for failure to remove sexually explicit image from Web site, online service or application, or mobile application upon request — Damages — Statute of limitations.

A civil action may be maintained under this section against any person who, in violation of KRS 531.120(3), does not remove a sexually explicit image upon the request of the person depicted in the image.

A civil action may be maintained under this section whether or not the individual who is alleged to have violated KRS

531.120

(3) has been charged or convicted under KRS

531.120

. Liability under this section shall include damages of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each sexually explicit image for each day the image remains on the Web site after receipt of the request.

An action under this section shall be brought within two (2) years of the last act of conduct in violation of KRS 531.120(3).

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 50, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

411.220.
Action by crime stalking victim against stalker — Damages — Statute of limitations.

A civil action may be maintained under this section against any person who commits the conduct prohibited under KRS

508.140

or

508.150

. A civil action may be maintained under this section whether or not the individual who is alleged to have violated KRS

508.140

or

508.150

has been charged or convicted of the alleged crime. Liability under this section shall include the actual damages caused by the violation and may include punitive damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees. An action under this section shall be brought within two (2) years of the last act of conduct in violation of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 400, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

411.225.
Employer immunity from civil liability for disclosure of employee information — Exceptions — Effect of provision.

An employer who provides information about the job performance, professional conduct, or evaluation of a former or current employee to a prospective employer of that employee, at the request of that employee or prospective employer, shall be immune from civil liability arising out of the disclosure unless the plaintiff in the civil action proves:

That the employer disclosed the information knowing that it was false, with reckless disregard of whether it was true or false, or with intent to mislead the prospective employer; or

That the disclosure of the information by the employer constitutes an unlawful discriminatory practice under KRS Chapter 344.

This section does not create a new cause of action or substantive legal right against an employer.

This section does not limit an employer’s immunity from civil liability or defenses established in another section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or available at common law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 77, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Kentucky Survey Issue: Article: Off-Duty Privacy: How Far Can Employers Go?, 37 N. Ky. L. Rev. 287 (2010).

411.230.
Action for damages caused by tampering with operations of key infrastructure asset.

A civil action may be maintained under this section against any person that knowingly directs or causes a person to violate KRS 512.020(1)(b). Liability shall include actual damages to personal or real property caused by the offense and may include punitive damages and court costs.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 12, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.